Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202179-433
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Reorganization of School Districts Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Reorganization of school districts means the formation of new school districts, the alteration of boundaries of established school districts that are not members of a learning community, and the dissolution or disorganization of established school districts through or by means of any one or combination of the methods set out in section 79-434; and

(2) State committee means the State Committee for the Reorganization of School Districts created by section 79-435.

Laws 1949, c. 249, § 1, p. 673;

Laws 1963, c. 479, § 1, p. 1536;

Laws 1990, LB 259, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-426.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 182;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 41;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 24;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 27;

Referendum 2006, No. 422;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 25.
August 28, 2021
Consolidation by election method is to be distinguished from proceedings by petition. Longe v. County of Wayne, 175 Neb. 245, 121 N.W.2d 196 (1963).

Plan of reorganization may be initiated by either county committee or state committee. School District No. 42 of Hitchcock County v. Marshall, 160 Neb. 832, 71 N.W.2d 549 (1955).

Reorganization of School Districts Act sustained as constitutional. Nickel v. School Board of Axtell, 157 Neb. 813, 61 N.W.2d 566 (1953).

This and subsequent 17 sections provide procedure for reorganization of school districts. Peterson v. Hancock, 155 Neb. 801, 54 N.W.2d 85 (1952).